Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.021

Write-in voting—Declaration of candidacy—Counting of vote.

(1) For any office, except precinct committee officer, at any election or primary, any voter may write in on the ballot the name of any person for an office. Votes must be individually tallied for a candidate who has filed as a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW 29A.24.311 as long as the requirements of subsection (6), (7), or (8) of this section are met. No write-in vote for a declared write-in candidate may be rejected due to variation in the form of the name if the canvassing board can determine the person and office for which the voter intended to vote.

(2) The total number of write-in votes cast for each office must be recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.

(3) A write-in vote for an individual candidate for an office whose name is printed on the ballot for that same office is a valid vote for that candidate as long as the candidate's name is clearly discernible, even if the voter also marked a vote for that candidate such as to otherwise register an overvote.

(4) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office whose name does not appear on the ballot need not be individually tallied unless the candidate has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy.

(5) In the case of write-in candidates for a statewide office or any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual candidate must be tallied when the county auditor is notified by the filing officer for that office that a candidate has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy. In all other cases, the county auditor determines, in accordance with this section, whether a candidate has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy and thus, write-in votes must be individually tallied. The county canvassing board must certify write-in votes including the vote total received by a candidate that has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy if the requirements of subsection (6), (7), or (8) of this section are met. Final results must consolidate the vote total associated with each candidate after the canvassing board has reconciled any variation in the spelling of names for those candidates.

(6) In a primary, if the name of only a single candidate appears on the ballot for an office, and the total number of write-in votes cast for that office exceeds one percent of the total number of votes cast for that office, the individual write-in votes for each candidate who has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy must be canvassed and reported. Otherwise, individual tallying of write-in votes is not required.

(7) In a primary, if two or more candidates appear on the ballot for an office and the total number of write-in votes cast for that office exceeds the number of votes cast for the candidate with the second highest number of votes, then the individual write-in votes for each candidate who has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy must be canvassed and reported. Otherwise, individual tallying of write-in votes is not required.

(8) In a general election, if the total number of write-in votes cast for an office exceeds the number of votes cast for the candidate apparently elected to that office, then the individual write-in votes for each candidate who has filed a timely declaration of write-in candidacy must be canvassed and reported. Otherwise, individual tallying of write-in votes is not required.

[ 2018 c 187 s 3; 2012 c 89 s 4; 2005 c 243 s 12; 2004 c 271 s 147.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—Effective date—2012 c 89: See notes following RCW 29A.24.311.